Louisiana, session 2026, HB185.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1021(introductory paragraph) and (7) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1021. Terms defined
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms shall be given have the meaning ascribed to them in this Section:
* * *
(7)(a) "Independent contractor" means any person who renders service, other
than manual labor, for a specified recompense for a specified result either as a unit
or as a whole, under the control of his principal as to results of his work only, and not
as to the means by which such result is accomplished, and are expressly excluded
from the provisions of this Chapter unless a substantial part of the work time of an
independent contractor is spent in manual labor by him in carrying out the terms of
the contract, in which case the independent contractor is expressly covered by the
provisions of this Chapter. The operation of a truck tractor or truck tractor trailer,
including fueling, driving, connecting and disconnecting electrical lines and air
hoses, hooking and unhooking trailers, and vehicle inspections are not manual labor
within the meaning of this Chapter.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 185 ENROLLED
(b) "Independent contractor", as defined in Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, who is substantially engaged in manual labor and is expressly covered by
the provisions of this Chapter, also includes the employees of an independent
contractor who are also substantially engaged in manual labor.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.